Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-24-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Trustees of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

“Creditable service” means prior service, membership service, and other service for which credit is allowed toward retirement under this chapter.

“Date of establishment” means July 1, 2002.

“Employer” means the State of Georgia.

“Fund” means the Georgia Military Pension Fund.

“Member” means any person included in the membership of the fund.

“Membership service” means service as a member of the fund.

“Prior service” means service rendered prior to July 1, 2002, as a member of the Georgia National Guard.

“Retirement allowance” means monthly payments for life pursuant to Code Section 47-24-101.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-24-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1153, § 1.